Massachusetts, session 194th, H3906.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding section 17 of Chapter 138 of the General Laws relative to
the number of licenses that may be granted in the Town of Somerset, the licensing authority of
the Town of Somerset may grant one (1) license for the sale of retail of wine and malt beverages
to be drunk off the premises under Section12 of said Chapter 138, to establishment located at
2756 County Street, in Somerset, MA.
The license shall comply with such requirements and conditions as the licensing authority
shall deem appropriate. The license shall be subject to all requirements of said Chapter 138,
except said section 17 relative to the number of licenses that may be granted. The license shall be
nontransferable to any other location, but a license granted under this act may be reissued to a
new applicant at the same location, if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from
the Department of Revenue indicating that the license is in good standing with the department
of 2

and that all applicable taxes have been paid. The licenses shall be subject to all other provisions
of said Chapter 138.
Section 2. If a license granted under this act is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it
shall be returned physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining
thereto, to the licensing authority which may then grant the license to a new applicant within the
same location under the same terms and conditions as specified in this act.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2